Utah statutes.
26-2-28.   Birth certificate for foreign adoptees.
Upon presentation of a court order of adoption and an order establishing the
fact, time, and place of birth under Section 26-2-15, the department shall
prepare a birth certificate for any person who:
(1)  was adopted under the laws of this state; and
(2)  was at the time of adoption considered an alien child for whom the court
received documentary evidence of legal residence under Section 78B-6-108.
